Maryland, session 2025, SB0324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0324*

SENATE BILL 324
Article – Tax – General
4–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Admissions and amusement charge”, unless expressly provided
otherwise, means a charge for:
(i) admission to a place, including any additional separate charge
for admission within an enclosure;
(ii) use of a game of entertainment;
(iii) use of a recreational or sports facility;
(iv) use or rental of recreational or sports equipment; and
(v) merchandise, refreshments, or a service sold or served in
connection with entertainment at a nightclub or room in a hotel, restaurant, hall, or other
place where dancing privileges, music, or other entertainment is provided.
(2) “Admissions and amusement charge” does not include a charge for
admission to a political fundraising event.
(C) “FOOD OR BEVERAGES” MEANS:
(1) FOOD AS DEFINED IN § 11–206 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(2) AN ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE AS DEFINED IN § 5–101 OF THIS
ARTICLE;
(3) A SOFT DRINK, A CARBONATED BEVERAGE, OR BOTTLED WATER;
OR
(4) CANDY OR CONFECTIONERY.
[(c)] (D) “Game of entertainment” includes, in Anne Arundel County or Calvert
County, the game of instant bingo permitted under a commercial bingo license.
[(d)] (E) “Person” includes:
(1) this State or a political subdivision, unit, or instrumentality of this
State;

SENATE BILL 324 3
(2) another state or a political subdivision, unit, or instrumentality of that
state; and
(3) a unit or instrumentality of a political subdivision of this State or of
another state.
[(e)] (F) “Stadium Authority” means the Maryland Stadium Authority created
under § 10–604 of the Economic Development Article.
4–102.
(b) A county may impose, by resolution, a tax on:
(1) the gross receipts derived from any admissions and amusement charge
in that county; [and]
(2) an admission in that county for a reduced charge or at no charge to a
place if there is a charge for other admissions to the place; AND
(3) THE GROSS RECEIPTS DERIVED FROM THE SALE OF FOOD OR
BEVERAGES AT A PLACE WHERE THERE ARE FACILITIES FOR THE CONSUMPTION OF
FOOD OR BEVERAGES ON THE PREMISES.
(c) A municipal corporation may impose, by ordinance or resolution, a tax on:
(1) the gross receipts derived from any admissions and amusement charge
in that municipal corporation; [and]
(2) an admission in that municipal corporation for a reduced charge or at
no charge to a place if there is a charge for other admissions to the place; AND
(3) THE GROSS RECEIPTS DERIVED FROM THE SALE OF FOOD OR
BEVERAGES AT A PLACE WHERE THERE ARE FACILITIES FOR THE CONSUMPTION OF
FOOD OR BEVERAGES ON THE PREMISES.
4–103.
(b) The admissions and amusement tax may not be imposed by a county or
municipal corporation on gross receipts:
(1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 4–102(B)(3) AND (C)(3) OF THIS
SUBTITLE, derived from any charge for merchandise, refreshments, or a service sold or
served at a place where:
(i) dancing is prohibited; and

SENATE BILL 324
(ii) the only entertainment provided is mechanical music, radio, or
television;
(2) derived from any charge for admission to:
(i) a live boxing or wrestling match; or
(ii) a concert or theatrical event presented or offered by a nonprofit
group that:
1. is organized and operated to present or offer an annual
series of scheduled musical concerts; or
2. is organized and operated for a cultural purpose and
receives a grant directly or indirectly from the Maryland State Arts Council;
(3) derived from any charge for admission to or use of:
(i) a facility or equipment in connection with a bingo game that is
operated in accordance with § 13–507 of the Criminal Law Article;
(ii) a bowling alley or lane;
(iii) a charter fishing boat; or
(iv) a nontethered hot air balloon;
(4) derived from any charge for admission or for merchandise,
refreshments, or a service, if the gross receipts are used exclusively for:
(i) a charitable, educational, or religious purpose;
(ii) a volunteer fire company or nonprofit rescue squad;
(iii) a fraternal, service, or veterans’ organization chartered by a
grant of Congress; or
(iv) the improvement, maintenance, or operation of an agricultural
fair, if no net earnings inure to the benefit of any stockholder or member of the association
that conducts the fair; [or]
(5) obtained at admission and used for the cost of prizes or as money
winnings distributed, as part of its operation, by a commercial bingo game in Anne Arundel
County; OR
(6) DERIVED FROM THE SALE OF:

SENATE BILL 324 5
(I) AN ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE THAT IS SOLD FOR
CONSUMPTION OFF THE PREMISES;
(II) FOOD OR BEVERAGES FOR CONSUMPTION OFF THE
PREMISES IF SOLD BY A VENDOR THAT OPERATES A SUBSTANTIAL GROCERY OR
MARKET BUSINESS AT THE SAME LOCATION WHERE THE FOOD OR BEVERAGES ARE
SOLD, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE SALE IS SUBJECT TO THE SALES AND USE TAX;
OR
(III) FOOD OR BEVERAGES FROM VENDING MACHINES.
4–105.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the admissions and amusement
tax rate is:
(1) the rate that a county or municipal corporation sets, not exceeding 10%
of gross receipts subject to the admissions and amusement tax; or
(2) the rate that the Stadium Authority sets, not exceeding 8% of gross
receipts subject to the admissions and amusement tax.
(A–2) THE TAX RATE SET BY A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION ON
GROSS RECEIPTS DERIVED FROM THE SALE OF FOOD OR BEVERAGES UNDER §
4–102(B)(3) AND (C)(3) OF THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT EXCEED 3%.
(b) (1) [If] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, IF gross receipts subject to the admissions and amusement tax are also
subject to the sales and use tax, a county or a municipal corporation may not set a rate so
that, when combined with the sales and use tax, the total tax rate will exceed 11% of the
gross receipts.
(2) THE MAXIMUM TOTAL TAX RATE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION DOES NOT INCLUDE A TAX RATE SET BY A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A–2) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.